Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1006
Clerk; judicial statistics; report.

The clerk of each court shall report judicial statistics to the Supreme Court at such times and in such manner as prescribed by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1961, c. 103, § 1, p. 335;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 24-337.01;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 35.